Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5112.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-22-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-22 entitled "Curriculum
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read
as follows:
16-22-4. Instruction in health and physical education.
(a) All children in grades one through twelve (12) attending public schools, or any other
schools managed and controlled by the state, except as provided in § 16-100-3(d), shall receive in
those schools instruction in health and physical education under rules and regulations the
department of elementary and secondary education may prescribe or approve during periods that
shall average at least twenty (20) minutes in each school day. No private school or private
instruction shall be approved by any school committee for the purposes of chapter 19 of this title
as substantially equivalent to that required by law of a child attending a public school in the same
city or town unless instruction in health and physical education similar to that required in public
schools shall be given. Commencing September 1, 2012, the required health education curriculum
shall be based on the health education standards of the Rhode Island health education framework:
health literacy for all students as promulgated by the Rhode Island department of education and
consistent with the mandated health instructional outcomes therein. Commencing September 1,
2012, the required physical education curriculum shall be based on the physical education standards
of the Rhode Island physical education framework: supporting physically active lifestyles through
quality physical education as promulgated by the Rhode Island department of education and

consistent with the instructional outcomes therein.
(b) The department of elementary and secondary education shall incorporate, in
consultation with the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and
hospitals, substance abuse prevention and suicide prevention into the health education curriculum.
For the purpose of this section, “substance abuse prevention” means the implementation of
evidence-based, age-appropriate programs, practices, or curricula related to the use and abuse of
alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs; “suicide prevention” means the implementation of evidence-
based, appropriate programs, practices, or curricula related to mental health awareness and suicide
prevention. Further, “substance abuse prevention” and suicide prevention programs shall
specifically include information provided to students that mixing opioids and alcohol can cause
accidental death.
(c) The department of education shall promulgate guidelines, rules and regulations for
every school district, private school, mayoral academy, and charter school and make available on
its website, curriculum materials and such other materials as may assist local and regional school
committees, and governing bodies of any private school, mayoral academy, or charter school in
developing instructional material on the multiple dimensions of health by including mental health
and the relation of physical and mental health in order to enhance student understanding, attitudes
and behaviors that promote health, well-being and human dignity. The curriculum material and the
guidelines shall be developed by the department of education in consultation with groups and
individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of mental health and mental illness
treatment.
(d) Every school district shall include in its curriculum for all seventh grade students, a
four (4) hour unit of instruction on mental health and the relation of physical and mental health.
School districts may utilize materials provided by the department of education and the curriculum
shall be provided for the 2026-2027 school year and each school year thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000099
========
LC000099 - Page 2 of 3